Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 1. Social Security Benefits.

§ 25-11-1.
Citation.

Articles 1 and 3 shall be known and cited as the Public Employees’ Retirement Law of 1952.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-25; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 25, eff January 1, 1953.

§ 25-11-3.
Purpose and declaration of policy.

In order to extend to employees of the state and its political subdivisions and of the instrumentalities of either, and to the dependents and survivors of such employees, the basic protection accorded to others by the old-age and survivors insurance system embodied in the Social Security Act, it is hereby declared to be the policy of this state, subject to the limitations of Articles 1 and 3, that such steps be taken, and they are hereby expressly authorized, as to provide such protection to employees of the state and its political subdivisions and of the instrumentalities of either on as broad a basis as is permitted under applicable federal law. It is also the policy of the Legislature that the protection afforded employees in positions covered by a retirement system on the date an agreement under this article is made applicable to service performed in such positions, or receiving periodic benefits under such retirement system at such time, will not be impaired as a result of making the agreement so applicable or as a result of legislative enactment in anticipation thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-01; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 346, § 1, eff April 1, 1956.

§ 25-11-5.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article:

The term “wages” means all remuneration for employment as defined herein, including the cash value of all remuneration paid in any medium other than cash, except that such term shall not include that part of such remuneration which, even if it were for “employment” within the meaning of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, would not constitute “wages” within the meaning of that act. The amount by which an eligible employee’s salary is reduced pursuant to a salary reduction agreement authorized under Section 25-17-5 shall be excluded from the term “wages”, provided such exclusion does not conflict with federal law, including federal regulations and federal administrative interpretations thereunder, pertaining to the Federal Insurance Contributions Act or to Internal Revenue Code Section 125 cafeteria plans. If any salary reduction amounts excluded from “wages” under the prior sentence are determined to be “wages” by the Social Security Administration or the Internal Revenue Service and payroll tax deficiencies are assessed, the deficiencies shall be borne by the eligible employee and the adopting state agency or local governmental entity and not by the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi as state administrator.

The term “employment” means any service performed by an employee in the employ of the state, any political subdivision thereof, or any instrumentality of either for such employer, except (i) service which in the absence of an agreement entered into under this article would constitute “employment” as defined in the Social Security Act; or (ii) service which under applicable federal law may not be included in an agreement between the state and the Secretary of Health, Education and Welfare entered into under this article; or (iii) service in positions covered by a retirement system established by the state or by a political subdivision or an instrumentality of either on the date the agreement referred to in Section 25-11-7 or any modification of such agreement is made applicable to the coverage group (as defined in Section 218(b)(5) of the Social Security Act) to which the employee performing such services belongs. Service which under the Social Security Act may be included in an agreement only upon certification by the Governor in accordance with Section 218(d)(3) of that act shall be included in the term “employment” if and when the Governor issues, with respect to such service, a certificate to the Secretary of Health, Education and Welfare pursuant to Section 25-11-11(5) of this article.

Services, the compensation for which is on a fee basis, may, to the extent permitted by applicable federal law, be excluded in any plan or agreement approved under or authorized by this article.

The term “employee,” in addition to its usual meaning, includes an officer of a state, a political subdivision thereof, or an instrumentality of either, and all school employees.

The term “board” means the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi as provided by Section 25-11-15 of this article.

The term Secretary of Health, Education and Welfare includes any individual to whom the Secretary of Health, Education and Welfare has delegated any functions under the Social Security Act with respect to coverage under such act of employees of states and their political subdivisions and, with respect to any action taken prior to April 11, 1953, includes the federal security administrator or any individual to whom he had delegated any such function.

The term “political subdivision” includes any county, municipality, or other political subdivision within the State of Mississippi to which has been delegated certain functions of local government, and employees thereof who are eligible to become a coverage group under the terms of the Social Security Act.

The term “instrumentality,” when referring to an instrumentality of the state or political subdivision, includes only a juristic entity which is legally separate and distinct from the state or such subdivision and whose employees are not by virtue of their relation to such entity employees of the state or such subdivision.

The term “applicable federal law” refers to such provisions of federal law (including federal regulations and requirements issued pursuant thereto), as provide for extending the benefits of Title II of the Social Security Act to employees of states, political subdivisions, and their instrumentalities.

The term “Social Security Act” means the Act of Congress approved August 14, 1935, Chapter 531, 49 Stat 620, officially cited as “The Social Security Act,” as such act has been and may from time to time be amended.

The term “Federal Insurance Contribution Act” means subchapter A of Chapter 9 of the Federal Internal Revenue Code of 1939 and subchapters A and B of Chapter 21 of the Federal Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as such Codes have been and may from time to time be amended; and the term “employee tax” means the tax imposed by Section 1400 of such Code of 1939 and Section 3101 of such Code of 1954.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-02; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 346, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 513, § 6; brought forward without change, Laws, 1987, ch. 345, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 25-11-7.
Federal-state agreement.

The board, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby authorized to enter on behalf of the state into an agreement with the Secretary of Health, Education and Welfare, consistent with the terms and provisions of this article, for the purpose of extending the benefits of the federal old-age and survivors insurance system to employees of the state or any instrumentality of any one or more of the foregoing, with respect to services specified in such agreement which constitute “employment” as defined in Section 25-11-5 of this article. Such agreement may contain such provisions as the board and the Secretary of Health, Education and Welfare shall agree upon, but except as may be otherwise required by or under applicable federal law as to the services to be covered, such agreement shall provide in effect that:

Benefits will be provided for employees whose services are covered by the agreement (and their dependents and survivors) on the same basis as though such services constituted employment within the meaning of Title II of the Social Security Act;

The state will pay to the Secretary of the Treasury at such time or times as may be prescribed by the applicable federal law or by regulation promulgated thereunder, contributions with respect to wages (as defined in Section 25-11-5 of this article) equal to the sum of the taxes which would be imposed by the Federal Insurance Contributions Act if the services covered by the agreement constituted employment within the meaning of that act;

Such modification shall be effective with respect to services in employment covered by the agreement performed after a date specified therein provided such date is not inconsistent with the applicable provision of the federal law;

All services which constitute employment as defined in Section 25-11-5 and are performed in the employ of the state by employees of the state shall be covered by the agreement; and

All services which (i) constitute employment as defined in Section 25-11-5, (ii) are performed in the employ of a political subdivision or in the employ of an instrumentality of either the state or a political subdivision, or both, and (iii) are covered by a plan which is in conformity with the terms of the agreement and which has been approved by the board under Section 25-11-11 shall be covered by the agreement.

As modified, the agreement shall include all services described in either paragraph (d) or paragraph (e) of this subsection and performed by individuals to whom Section 218(C)(3)(C) of the Social Security Act is applicable, and shall provide that the service of any such individual shall continue to be covered by the agreement in case he thereafter becomes eligible to be a member of a retirement system; and

As modified, the agreement shall include all services described in either paragraph (d) or paragraph (e) of this subsection and performed by individuals in positions covered by a retirement system with respect to which the Governor has issued a certificate to the Secretary of Health, Education and Welfare pursuant to Section 25-11-11(8) of this article.

Any instrumentality jointly created by this state and any other state or states is hereby authorized, to the extent that this state may confer authority, upon the granting of like authority by such other state or states, (i) to enter into an agreement with the Secretary of Health, Education and Welfare whereby the benefits of the federal old-age and survivors insurance system shall be extended to employees of such instrumentality, (ii) to require its employees to pay (and for that purpose to deduct from their wages) contributions equal to the amounts which they would be required to pay under Section 25-11-9(1) if they were covered by an agreement made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, and (iii) to make payments to the secretary of the treasury in accordance with such agreement, including payment from its own funds, and otherwise to comply with such agreement. Such agreement shall, to the extent practicable, be consistent with the terms and provisions of subsection (1) hereof and other provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-03; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 3; Laws, 1956, ch. 346, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 544.

§ 25-11-9.
Contributions by state employees.

Every employee of the state whose services are covered by an agreement entered into under Section 25-11-7 shall be required to pay for the period of such coverage, into the contribution fund established by Section 25-11-13, contributions, with respect to wages (as defined in Section 25-11-5 of this article), equal to the amount of tax which would be imposed by section 1400 of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act if such services constituted employment within the meaning of that act. Such liability shall arise in consideration of the employee’s retention in the service, or his entry upon such service, after the enactment of Articles 1 and 3.

The contribution imposed by this section shall be collected by the state by deducting the amount of the contributions from wages as and when paid, but failure to make such deduction shall not relieve the employee from liability for such contribution.

If more or less than the correct amount of the contribution imposed by this section is paid or deducted with respect to any remuneration, proper adjustments, or refund if adjustment is impracticable, shall be made, without interest, in such manner and at such times as the board shall prescribe.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-04; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 4.

§ 25-11-11.
Coverage of employees of political subdivisions and instrumentalities.

Each political subdivision of the state and each instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision, or of both, is hereby authorized to submit for approval by the board a plan for extending the benefits of this article, in conformity with applicable federal law, to employees of any such political subdivision or instrumentality. Each such plan or any amendment thereof shall be approved by the board if it finds that such plan, or such plan as amended, is in conformity with such requirements as are provided in regulations of the board, except that no such plan shall be approved unless:

It is in conformity with the requirements of the applicable federal law and with the agreement entered into under Section 25-11-7;

It provides that all services which constitute employment as defined in Section 25-11-5 and are performed in the employ of the political subdivision or instrumentality, by any employees thereof, shall be covered by the plan; except that it may exclude services performed by individuals to whom Section 218(C)(3)(c) of the Social Security Act is applicable;

It specifies the source or sources from which the funds necessary to make the payments required by paragraph (a) of subsection (3) and by subsection (4) are expected to be derived and contains reasonable assurance that such sources will be adequate for such purpose;

It provides for such methods of administration of the plan by the political subdivision or instrumentality as are found by the board to be necessary for the proper and efficient administration thereof;

It provides that the political subdivision or instrumentality will make such reports, in such form and containing such information, as the board may from time to time require, and comply with such provisions as the board or the secretary of health and human services may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports; and

It authorizes the board to terminate the plan in its entirety in the discretion of the board if it finds that there has been a failure to comply substantially with any provision contained in such plan, such determination to take effect at the expiration of such notice and on such conditions as may be provided by regulations of the board and as may be consistent with applicable federal law.

The board shall not finally refuse to approve a plan submitted under subsection (1) and shall not terminate an approved plan, without reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing to each political subdivision or instrumentality affected thereby. The board’s decision in any such case shall be final, conclusive, and binding unless an appeal be taken by the political subdivision or instrumentality aggrieved thereby to the Circuit Court of Hinds County, Mississippi, in accordance with the provisions of law with respect to review of civil cause by certiorari.

Each political subdivision or instrumentality as to which a plan has been approved under this section shall pay into the contribution fund, with respect to wages (as defined in Section 25-11-5 of this article,) at such time or times as the board may by regulation prescribe, contributions in the amounts and at the rates specified in the applicable agreement entered into by the board under Section 25-11-7.

Every political subdivision or instrumentality required to make payments under paragraph (a) of this subsection is authorized, in consideration of the employees’ retention in, or entry upon, employment after enactment of this article, to impose upon its employees, as to services which are covered by an approved plan, a contribution with respect to wages (as defined in Section 25-11-5 of this article), not exceeding the amount of tax which would be imposed by the Federal Insurance Contributions Act if such services constituted employment within the meaning of that act, and to deduct the amount of such contribution from the wages as and when paid. Contributions so collected shall be paid into the contribution fund in partial discharge of the liability of such political subdivision or instrumentality under paragraph (a) of this subsection. Failure to deduct such contribution shall not relieve the employee or employer of liability therefor.

Any state agency, school, political subdivision, instrumentality or any employer that is required to submit contribution payments or wage reports under any section of this chapter shall be assessed interest on delinquent payments or wage reports as determined by the board of trustees and such assessed interest may be recovered by action in a court of competent jurisdiction against such reporting agency liable therefor or may, upon due certification of delinquency and at the request of the board, be deducted from any other moneys payable to such reporting agency by any department or agency of the state.

Referenda and certification. —The Governor is empowered to authorize a referendum, upon request of the governing body of a political subdivision or juristic entity of the state and to designate any agency or individual to supervise its conduct, in accordance with the requirements of Section 218(d)(3) of the Social Security Act, on the question of whether service in positions covered by a retirement system established by a political subdivision or juristic entity of the state should be excluded from or included under an agreement under this article. The notice of referendum required by Section 218(d)(3)(C) of the Social Security Act to be given to employees shall contain or shall be accompanied by a statement, in such form and such detail as the agency or individual designated to supervise the referendum shall deem necessary and sufficient, to inform the employees of the rights which will accrue to them and their dependents and survivors, and the liabilities to which they will be subject, if their services are included under an agreement under this article.

Only those persons may be allowed to vote in the referendum who are actually employed in the employment which occasioned their membership in their retirement system at the time that the referendum is offered, and a majority of the members so qualified to vote must vote in favor of the referendum in order for it to become effective.

In the event of a negative vote in the referendum, no additional referendum may be held within a period of less than one (1) year; and in the event of an affirmative vote of the referendum, their agreement must be executed with the public employees’ retirement system of Mississippi to cover such employees within six (6) months after the affirmative vote has been determined in the referendum.

Upon receiving evidence satisfactory to him that, with respect to any such referendum, the conditions specified in Section 218(d)(3) of the Social Security Act have been met, the governor shall so certify to the secretary of health and human services.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-05; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 5; Laws, 1956, ch. 346, § 4; Laws, 1983, ch. 449, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1983).

§ 25-11-13.
Contribution fund.

There is hereby established a special fund, separate and apart from all public moneys or funds of this state, to be known as a contribution fund, which shall be administered by the board exclusively for the purposes of this article. Such fund shall consist of and there shall be deposited in such fund: (a) All contributions, interest and penalties collected under Sections 25-11-9 and 25-11-11; (b) all moneys appropriated or otherwise contributed thereto; (c) any property or securities and earnings thereof acquired through the use of moneys belonging to the fund; (d) interest earned upon any moneys in the fund; and (e) all sums recovered upon the bond of any official or otherwise for losses sustained by the fund and all other moneys received for the fund from any other source. All moneys in the fund shall be mingled and undivided. Subject to the provisions of this article, the board is vested with full power, authority and jurisdiction over the fund, including all moneys and property or securities belonging thereto, and may perform any and all acts, whether or not specifically designated, which are necessary to the administration thereof consistent with the provisions of this article.

Withdrawals from such fund shall be made for, and solely for (A) payment of amounts required to be paid to the Secretary of the Treasury pursuant to and in accordance with an agreement entered into under Section 25-11-7 of this article; (B) payment of refunds provided for in Section 25-11-9(3) of this article; and (C) refunds of overpayments, not otherwise adjustable, made by a political subdivision or instrumentality.

The State Treasurer shall be the ex officio treasurer and custodian of the contribution fund, shall administer such fund in accordance with the provisions of this article and the directions of the board, and shall pay all warrants drawn upon it in accordance with the provisions of this section and with such regulations as the board may prescribe pursuant thereto or pursuant to the provisions of any other applicable law of this state with respect thereto. The State Treasurer shall be liable on his official bond for the faithful performance of his duties in connection with the contribution fund under this article.

From the contribution fund the custodian of the fund shall pay to the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States such amounts and at such time or times as may be directed by the board in accordance with any agreement entered into under Section 25-11-7 and applicable federal law.

The board shall submit to the Governor and the Legislative Budget Office at least ninety (90) days in advance of the beginning of each Regular Session of the State Legislature, or at such time as may be otherwise required by law, an estimate of the amounts deemed by it as necessary for appropriation to the contribution fund and for the administration of Articles 1 and 3 for each ensuing fiscal year.

The board, in its discretion, may authorize or designate each agency of the state, each political subdivision of the state, and each instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision to individually deposit for and on behalf of the state, in accordance with Section 25-11-7, social security contributions directly in the Federal Reserve Bank or any other social security contribution collection fund established by the Social Security Administration, Department of Health and Human Services, and all contributions or other payments as required under Sections 25-11-9 and 25-11-11.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-06; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 6; Laws, 1970, ch. 522, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 174; Laws, 1985, ch. 325, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1985).

§ 25-11-15.
Administration and operation of Public Employees’ Retirement System, federal-state agreement, and Articles 1 and 3.

Board of trustees: The general administration and responsibility for the proper operation of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and the federal-state agreement and for making effective the provisions of Articles 1 and 3 are vested in a board of trustees.

The board shall consist of ten (10) trustees, as follows:

The State Treasurer;

One (1) member who shall be appointed by the Governor for a term of four (4) years, who shall be a member of the system;

Two (2) members of the system having at least ten (10) years of creditable service who are state employees who are not employees of the state institutions of higher learning, who shall be elected by members of the system who are employees of state agencies and by members of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System, but not by employees of the state institutions of higher learning;

Two (2) members of the system having at least ten (10) years of creditable service who do not hold office in the legislative or judicial departments of municipal or county government, one (1) of whom shall be an employee of a municipality, instrumentality or juristic entity thereof, who shall be elected by members of the system who are employees of the municipalities, instrumentalities or juristic entities thereof and by members of the municipal systems and the firemen’s and policemen’s disability and relief funds administered by the board of trustees, and one (1) of whom shall be an employee of a county, instrumentality or juristic entity thereof, who shall be elected by members of the system who are employees of the counties, instrumentalities or juristic entities thereof;

One (1) member of the system having at least ten (10) years of creditable service who is an employee of a state institution of higher learning, who shall be elected by members of the system who are employees of the state institutions of higher learning as included in Section 37-101-1. Any member of the board on July 1, 1984, who is an employee of an institution of higher learning shall serve as the member trustee representing the institutions of higher learning until the end of the term for which he or she was elected;

Two (2) retired members who are receiving a retirement allowance from the system, who shall be elected by the retired members or beneficiaries receiving a retirement allowance from the system and by the retired members or beneficiaries of the municipal systems, the firemen’s and policemen’s disability and relief funds and the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System administered by the board of trustees, to serve for a term of six (6) years under rules and regulations adopted by the board to govern that election; however, any retired member of the board in office on April 19, 1993, shall serve as a retired trustee until the end of the term for which he or she was elected;

One (1) member of the system having at least ten (10) years of creditable service who is an employee of any public school district or junior college or community college district that participates in the system, who shall be elected by the members of the system who are employees of any public school district or junior college or community college district; however, any member of the board on June 30, 1989, who is a certified classroom teacher shall serve as the member representing a classroom teacher until the end of the term for which the member was appointed;

In the first election to be held for trustees one (1) member shall be elected for a term of two (2) years, and one (1) member for a term of four (4) years, and one (1) member for a term of six (6) years. Thereafter, their successors shall be elected for terms of six (6) years. All elections shall be held in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board to govern those elections and the board shall be the sole judge of all questions arising incident to or connected with the elections.

Any person eligible to vote for the election of a member of the board of trustees and who meets the qualifications for the office may seek election to the office and serve if elected. For purposes of determining eligibility to seek office as a member of the board of trustees, the required creditable service in “the system” shall include each system administered by the board of trustees in which the person is a member.

The members described above and serving on the board on June 30, 1989, shall continue to serve on the board until the expiration of their terms.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of a trustee, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the office was previously filled. However, if the unexpired term is six (6) months or less, an election shall be held to fill the office vacated for the next succeeding full term of office, and the person so elected to fill the next full term shall be appointed by the board to fill the remainder of the unexpired term. Whenever any member who is elected to a position to represent a class of members ceases to be a member of that class, that board member is no longer eligible for membership on the board. The position shall be declared vacant, and the unexpired term shall be filled in the same manner as the office was previously filled.

Each trustee shall, within ten (10) days after his or her appointment or election, take an oath of office as provided by law and, in addition, shall take an oath that he or she will diligently and honestly administer the affairs of the board, and that he or she will not knowingly violate or willingly permit to be violated any of the provisions of law applicable to Articles 1 and 3. The oath shall be signed by the member making it, certified by the officer before whom it is taken, and immediately filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

Each trustee shall be entitled to one (1) vote. Six (6) members shall constitute a quorum at any meeting of the board, and a majority of those present shall be necessary for a decision.

Subject to the limitations of Articles 1 and 3, the board shall establish rules and regulations for the administration of the system created by those articles and for the transaction of its business, and to give force and effect to the provisions of those articles wherever necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of the Legislature. The cited articles are remedial law and shall be liberally construed to accomplish their purposes.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, in the event of a natural disaster or other occurrence that results in the failure of the retirement system’s computer system or a significant disruption of the normal activities of the retirement system, the executive director of the board, or his or her deputy, shall be authorized to contract with another entity, governmental or private, during the period of the failure or disruption, for services, commodities, work space and supplies as necessary to carry out the administration of all systems and programs administered by the board. The board shall be authorized to pay the reasonable cost of those services, commodities, work space and supplies. At the meeting of the board next following the execution of a contract authorized under this subsection, documentation of the contract, including a description of the services, commodities, work space or supplies, the price thereof and the nature of the disaster or occurrence, shall be presented to the board and placed on the minutes of the board. Because of their emergency nature, purchases made under this subsection shall not be required to comply with the provisions of Section 31-7-13 or any other law governing public purchases.

The computer equipment and software owned by the Public Employees’ Retirement System are assets of the Trust Fund by virtue of the Constitution, Section 272-A and acquisition and operation thereof shall be under the jurisdiction of the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

The board shall elect a chairman and shall by a majority vote of all of its members appoint a secretary whose title shall be executive director, who shall serve at the will and pleasure of the board, who shall not be a member of the board of trustees, who shall be entitled to membership in the system, and who shall act as secretary of the board. The board of trustees shall employ such actuarial, clerical and other employees as are required to transact the business of the system, and shall fix the compensation of all employees, subject to the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board.

Each member of the board shall receive as compensation for his or her services Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) per month. All members of the board shall be reimbursed for their necessary traveling expenses, which shall be paid in accordance with the requirements of Section 25-3-41 or other applicable statutes with respect to traveling expenses of state officials and employees on official business. All members of the board shall be entitled to be members of the system and shall be entitled to creditable service for all time served as a member of the board, except for the retired members, who shall not be entitled to be a member of the system and who shall be eligible to receive the retirement allowance and compensation for services from the system while serving as a member of the board. Members of the board who are employed in state service (as defined in Section 25-11-103) shall not be required to take annual leave from their state service employment while performing his or her official duties as a member of the board.

All expenses of the board incurred in the administration of Articles 1 and 3 shall be paid from such funds as may be appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose or from administrative fees collected from political subdivisions or juristic entities of the state. Each political subdivision of the state and each instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision or subdivisions that submit a plan for approval by the board as provided in Section 25-11-11 shall reimburse the board, for coverage into the administrative expense fund, its pro rata share of the total expense of administering Articles 1 and 3 as provided by regulations of the board.

The Lieutenant Governor may designate two (2) Senators and the Speaker of the House of Representatives may designate two (2) Representatives to attend any meeting of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System. The appointing authorities may designate alternate members from their respective houses to serve when the regular designees are unable to attend the meetings of the board. The legislative designees shall have no jurisdiction or vote on any matter within the jurisdiction of the board. For attending meetings of the board, the legislators shall receive per diem and expenses, which shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses for attending meetings of the board will be paid while the Legislature is in session. No per diem and expenses will be paid except for attending meetings of the board without prior approval of the proper committee in their respective houses.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-07; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 7; Laws, 1956, ch. 346, § 5; Laws, 1966, ch. 617, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 450, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 450, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, §§ 307 and 308; Laws, 1989, ch. 513, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 553, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 513, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 617, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 3; Laws, 2008, ch. 359, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 25-11-17.
Rules and regulations.

The board shall make, adopt, and promulgate such rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the provisions of Articles 1 and 3, as it finds necessary or appropriate to the efficient administration of the functions with which it is charged under said articles.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-08; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 8.

§ 25-11-19.
Studies and reports.

The board shall make studies concerning the problem of old-age and survivors insurance protection for employees of the state and local governments and their instrumentalities and concerning the operation of agreements made and plans approved under Articles 1 and 3, shall submit a report to the Governor not later than the first day of February in each year covering the administration and operation of both articles during the preceding calendar year, and shall make such recommendations for amendments to said articles as it deems proper.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-09; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 9.

§ 25-11-21.
Former laws remain in force.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed as repealing any existing law of this state providing for retirement of public employees.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-10; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 10.